Idaho, session 2025, S1207.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Division of Indirect Support Services the following amounts to be expended
according to the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $425,800 $1,318,800 $1,744,600
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 425,800 1,548,300 1,974,100
TOTAL $851,600 $2,867,100 $3,718,700
SECTION 2. REQUIRING A REPORT ON STATE VEHICLES. The Department of
Health and Welfare shall provide a report on vehicle resources within the
agency and proposed strategies and solutions to maximize vehicle use and
minimize costs. The report shall include utilization data and determina-
tions of whether vehicle count, allocation, and type are appropriate for the
agency's operations with a focus on efficiency, economy, and cost effective-
ness. The format of the report and the content therein shall be determined by
the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office
and shall be submitted to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and the
Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office no
later than December 15, 2025.


SECTION 3. REQUIRING A REPORT ON ADMINISTRATIVE BURDEN. The Department
of Health and Welfare shall provide a report on the administrative burden
of applying for, implementing, and administering federal grants, including
the paperwork burden and time to comply with federal requirements. The re-
port shall be submitted to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and
the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office
no later than August 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Licensing and Certification program
may transfer personnel costs pursuant to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. REQUIRING A REPORT ON THE TRANSITION OF LICENSING AND CER-
TIFICATION. The Department of Health and Welfare shall provide a report
outlining the steps necessary to transition the Division of Licensing and
Certification to the Division of Occupational and Professional Licenses
(DOPL). The Department of Health and Welfare shall collaborate with DOPL to
draft legislation that would enable the relocation of funding and staff, to
obtain necessary federal approvals, and on other considerations to facili-
tate a transition without interruption of public services. The report shall
be submitted to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and the Budget
and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office no later
than January 5, 2026.
SECTION 6. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Anal-
ysis Division of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes
related to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to
standard federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost
allocation plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency
support staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.
SECTION 7. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 8. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Licensing and Certification program


may transfer personnel costs pursuant to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for
the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 8 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 7 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.